Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB215.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1116. Professional Librarian.--Each public school in this Commonwealth shall employ at least one professional librarian who is certified under 24 Pa.C.S. § 9319 (relating to certification of library personnel).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516